Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1534
Family support program; evaluation.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall collaborate with a private, nonprofit organization with expertise in developmental disabilities for an independent evaluation of the family support program set forth in section 68-1530 if private funding is made available for such purpose. The evaluation shall be completed by December 15, 2023, and shall be submitted electronically to the department and to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature.

Laws 2022, LB376, § 6.